Florida, session 2026, HB895.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 736.10081, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb895 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 895, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
to read:
736.10081 Nonjudicial settlement and discharge of a
trustee; disclosure; objections.—
(1) A trustee who is in substantial compliance with the
duty to inform and account under s. 736.0813 may obtain a
settlement of his or her accounts and be discharged pursuant to
this section when either of the following occurs 6 months
after the trustee's acceptance:
(a) The trust terminates.
(b) A trustee resigns or is removed from the trust.
(2) A trustee seeking settlement and discharge pursuant to
this section must send to the trust's qualified beneficiaries
and any cotrustee, and the immediate successor trustee if the
trust is not terminating, a trust disclosure document as defined
in s. 736.1008(4) which contains all of the following:
(a) The name, mailing address, telephone number, and e-
mail address of the trustee seeking discharge.
(b) A plan of distribution which includes all of the
following:
1. A schedule of the assets reasonably anticipated to be
disbursed or distributed by the trustee.
2. The amount of any debts, expenses, and taxes to be paid
by the trustee.
3. Any reasonable reserve to be held by the trustee.
(c) If the trustee's duty to account has not been waived,
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb895 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 895, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
a trust accounting as defined in s. 736.1008(4) for the period
for which an accounting has not been previously provided to the
qualified beneficiaries of the trust.
(d) A statement that the trust has terminated or that the
trustee has resigned or has been removed.
(e) A notice with substantially the following language in
at least 12-point type:

"NOTICE: Any claim or cause of action you might have
against the trustee arising from any matter disclosed
in a trust disclosure document may be barred unless a
written statement objecting is received by the trustee
from you within 60 days after your receipt of this
trust disclosure document and notice. If you have
questions, please consult your attorney."

(3) The trustee shall also send the trust disclosure
document described in subsection (2) to any other person who the
trustee reasonably believes would be affected by the trust
disclosure document. The trust disclosure document and any
objections must be sent with the notice requirements of s.
736.0109, except that s. 736.0109(3) does not apply.
(4) This section does not apply if the trustee receives a
written objection within 60 days after sending the trust
disclosure document. An objection does not need to state the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb895 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 895, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
grounds for the objection or be in any particular form.
(5) If the trustee does not receive a timely written
objection, the trustee is discharged upon completion of all
distributions or transfers in accordance with the plan of
distribution and is discharged from all liability and claims
arising from any matter adequately disclosed in the trust
disclosure document, including any claim that the trustee failed
to inform and account pursuant to s. 736.0813, with the same
effect as if the court had entered a final order approving that
act or omission.
(6) A waiver of the right to object pursuant to this
section is treated as the expiration of the 60-day period
without objection.
(7) This section is in addition to, and not a replacement
of, rights of a trustee to otherwise settle the trustee's
accounts.
Section 2. This act applies to all trusts that are
irrevocable or become irrevocable on or after the effective date
of this act.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb895 -01-er